Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 1

General Provisions

61-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate referred to in § 61-2-201, and the certificate as amended;

“Confirmation of good standing” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that at the time such confirmation is issued a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership is current on all taxes and penalties to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

“Contribution” means any cash, property, services rendered or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a partner contributes to a limited partnership in his capacity as a partner;

“Court of record” means a court of equity jurisdiction in the county where the partnership maintains its registered office, or if it maintains no registered office in any county, then in a court of equity jurisdiction in Davidson County;

“Event of withdrawal of a general partner” means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner as provided in § 61-2-402;

“Foreign limited partnership” includes a partnership formed under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the state of Tennessee and having as partners one (1) or more general partners and one (1) or more limited partners;

“General partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and is so named in the certificate of limited partnership or similar instrument under which the limited partnership is organized, if so required;

“Limited partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner as provided in §§ 61-2-201 and 61-2-301, or, in the case of a foreign limited partnership, in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction under which the limited partnership is organized, if so required;

“Limited partnership” and “domestic limited partnership” mean a partnership formed by two (2) or more persons under the laws of the state of Tennessee, and having one (1) or more general partners and one (1) or more limited partners;

“Liquidating trustee” means a person, other than a general partner, but including a limited partner, carrying out the winding up of a limited partnership;

“Partner” means a limited or general partner;

“Partnership agreement” means any agreement, written or oral, of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business. A written partnership agreement:

May provide that a person shall be admitted as a limited partner of a limited partnership, or shall become an assignee of a partnership interest or other rights or powers of a limited partner to the extent assigned, and shall become bound by the partnership agreement:

If such person (or a representative authorized by such person orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) executes the partnership agreement or any other writing evidencing the intent of such person to become a limited partner or assignee; or

Without such execution, if such person (or a representative authorized by such person orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) complies with the conditions for becoming a limited partner or assignee as set forth in the partnership agreement or any other writing and requests (orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest) that the records of the limited partnership reflect such admission or assignment; and

Shall not be unenforceable by reason of its not having been signed by a person being admitted as a limited partner or becoming an assignee as provided in subdivision (12)(A), or by reason of its having been signed by a representative as provided in this title;

“Partnership interest” means a partner's share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets;

“Person” means a natural person, a foreign or domestic partnership (whether general or limited), trust, estate, association, corporation, custodian, nominee or any other individual or entity in its own or any representative capacity; and

“Tax clearance for termination or withdrawal” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that a limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership has filed all applicable reports, including, but not limited to, a final report, and has paid all fees, penalties and taxes as required by the revenue laws of this state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 1-3, 85; 2010, ch. 741, § 52; 2011, ch. 99, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201 — 61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Cross-References. Effective date and extended effective date, § 61-2-1204.

Equity participations, title 47, ch. 24.

Prior law, § 61-2-1206.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 412.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-301 — 6-303.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 3, 25.

Law Reviews.

Gray Power in the Gray Area Between Employer and Employee: The Applicability of the ADEA to Members of Limited Liability Companies, 51 Vand. L. Rev. 429 (1998).

Removal of General Partners: A Method of Intrapartnership Dispute Resolution for Limited Partnerships (Janet L. Eifert), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 1407 (1986).

The Revised Uniform Partnership Act in Tennessee (Richard Spore), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 30 (2001).

Where There's a Will: The 95% family-owned test for family limited partnerships (Dan Holbrook), 37 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 31 (2001).

When a Discount Isn't a Bargain: Debunking the Myths Behind Family Limited Partnerships (Katharine D. Black, Stephen T. Black, and Michael D. Black), 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 245 (2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Health facility certificate of need, OAG 89-38, 1989 Tenn AG LEXIS 19 (3/27/89).

61-2-102. Name of partnership.

The name of each limited partnership as set forth in its certificate of limited partnership:

Shall contain the words “Limited Partnership” or the abbreviation “L.P.”;

May contain the words “association,” “club,” “company,” “foundation,” “fund,” “institute,” “society,” “union,” “syndicate,” “limited,” “trust,” or abbreviations of like import, but shall not contain the words “corporation” or “incorporated” or abbreviations of like import;

May contain the name of a partner; and

Except as authorized by subdivision (4)(B), must be such as to distinguish it upon the records of the secretary of state from the respective names of or for every other entity, whether true, assumed, reserved or registered, to the extent the use or reservation of such names is evidenced by a filing with the secretary of state under applicable law;

A limited partnership, or person acting on behalf of a limited partnership not yet registered, may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subdivision (4)(A). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for, if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subdivision (4)(A) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of such name or change such name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subdivision (4)(A) consents in writing to the use of such name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 4, 5; 1994, ch. 868, §§ 10, 11; 2010, ch. 743, §§ 11, 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Cross-References. Limited liability companies, title 48, chs. 201-248.

Registration fee for articles, § 8-21-1001.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-401, 6-501.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-103. Reservation of name.

The exclusive right to the use of a name may be reserved by:

Any person intending to organize a limited partnership under this chapter and to adopt that name;

Any domestic limited partnership or any foreign limited partnership registered in the state of Tennessee which, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

Any foreign limited partnership intending to register in the state of Tennessee and to adopt that name; and

Any person intending to organize a foreign limited partnership and intending to have it registered in the state of Tennessee and to adopt that name.

The reservation of a specified name shall be made by a person filing with the secretary of state an application, executed by the applicant, which may be either a signed copy, specifying the name to be reserved and the name and address of the applicant. If the secretary of state finds that the name applied for meets the requirements of § 61-2-102 and is available for use by a domestic or foreign limited partnership, he shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a nonrenewable four-month period. The right to the exclusive use of a reserved name may be transferred to any other person by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer, executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved, specifying the name to be transferred and the name and address of the transferee. The reservation of a specified name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-501 — 6-503.

61-2-104. Registered office — Registered agent.

Each limited partnership must continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office, which may but need not be a place of its business in this state; and

A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual resident of this state whose business office is identical with the limited partnership's registered office, or a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state having a business office identical with such registered office.

A limited partnership may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The street address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office and zip code for such office, and the county in which the office is located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street address of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of his business office, he may change the street address of the registered office of any limited partnership for which he is the registered agent by notifying the limited partnership in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (b) and recites that the limited partnership has been notified of the change.

A registered agent may resign his agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by his certification that he has mailed a copy thereof to the principal office of the limited partnership by certified mail. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform his duties, the designating limited partnership shall promptly designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-601 — 6-604.

61-2-105. Service on partnership generally.

A limited partnership's registered agent is the limited partnership's agent for service of process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited partnership.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited partnership authorized to do business in this state fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, whenever its registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence, whenever a foreign limited partnership shall transact business or conduct affairs in this state without first submitting an application for registration with the secretary of state, or whenever the registration of a foreign limited partnership shall have been cancelled, then the secretary of state shall be an agent of such limited partnership upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited partnership authorized to do business in this state is an employer within the meaning of the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6, and such limited partnership is, for the purpose of such workers' compensation, self-insured or a part of a self-insurance pool as provided in title 50, chapter 6, part 4, such limited partnership shall, for workers' compensation actions only, be required to appoint the commissioner of commerce and insurance and his chief deputy, or their successors, as its true and lawful attorneys upon either of whom all lawful process in any such action or legal proceeding may be served, as is required of insurance companies by § 56-2-103.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

61-2-106. Service on secretary of state.

Service on the secretary of state, when the secretary of state is an agent for a domestic or foreign limited partnership as provided in § 61-2-105(b), of any process, notice or demand shall be made by delivering to the secretary of state the original and one (1) copy of such process, notice or demand, duly certified by the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending or brought, together with the proper fee. A statement which identifies which of the grounds (as listed in § 61-2-105(b)), for service on the secretary of state is applicable, must be included. The secretary of state shall endorse the time of receipt upon the original and copy and immediately shall send the copy, along with a written notice that service of the original was also made, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to such limited partnership at its registered office or principal office (or designated alternative mailing address) as shown in the records on file in the secretary of state's office or as shown in the official registry of the state or country in which such limited partnership is formed. If none of the previously mentioned addresses are available to the secretary of state, service may be made to any one (1) of the general partners at the address set forth in the certificate of limited partnership. The secretary of state may require the plaintiff (or complainant as the case may be) or the plaintiff's attorney to furnish the latter address.

The refusal or failure of such limited partnership to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail provided for in subsection (a), or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, shall not affect the validity of such service, and any such limited partnership refusing or failing to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be charged with knowledge of the contents of any process, notice or demand contained therein.

When the registered or certified mail return receipt is received by the secretary of state or when a limited partnership refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail and it is returned to the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall forward the receipt or such refused or undelivered mail to the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending, together with the original process, notice or demand, a copy of the notice the secretary of state sent to the defendant limited partnership and the affidavit setting forth compliance with this section. Upon receipt thereof, the clerk shall copy the affidavit on the rule docket of the court and shall mark it, the receipt or refused or undelivered mail, and the copy of notice as of the day received and place them in the file of the suit or action where the process and pleadings are kept, and such receipt or refused or undelivered mail, affidavit and copy of notice shall be and become a part of the technical record in the suit or action, and thereupon service on the defendant shall be complete. Service made under this section shall have the same legal force and validity as if the service had been made personally in this state.

Subsequent pleadings or papers permitted or required to be served on such defendant domestic or foreign limited partnership may be served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant limited partnership in the same manner, at the same cost and with the same effect as process, notice or demand are served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant limited partnership under this section.

No appearance shall be required in the suit or action by the defendant domestic or foreign limited partnership nor shall any judgment be taken against the domestic or foreign limited partnership in less than one (1) month after the date service is completed under this section.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices and demands served upon the secretary of state under this section, which record shall include the time of such service and the action with reference thereto.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 8; 2014, ch. 783, § 21

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

61-2-107. Business permitted.

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Law Reviews.

Limited Liability for Limited Partners: An Argument for the Abolition of the Control Rule (Joseph J. Basile, Jr.), 38 Vand. L. Rev. 1199 (1985).

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-108. Rights and obligations of partner.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to, borrow money from, act as a surety, guarantor or endorser for, guarantee or assume one (1) or more specific obligations of, provide collateral for, and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect thereto as a person who is not a partner.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

61-2-109. Indemnification of partner — Advancement of expenses.

Subject to such standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in its partnership agreement, a limited partnership may, and shall have the power to, indemnify and hold harmless any partner or other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever if:

He conducted himself in good faith;

He reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in his official capacity with the partnership, that his conduct was in its best interests; and

In all other cases, that his conduct was at least not opposed to its best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent is not, of itself, determinative that the partner did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

Unless limited by its partnership agreement, a partnership shall indemnify a partner who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which he is a party because he is or was a partner of the partnership against reasonable expenses incurred by him in connection with the proceeding.

A partnership may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a partner who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

The partner furnishes the partnership with a written affirmation of his good faith belief that he has met the standard of conduct described in subsection (a);

The partner furnishes the partnership with a written undertaking, executed personally or on his behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that he is not entitled to indemnification; and

A determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section;

The undertaking required by subdivision (c)(1)(B) must be an unlimited general obligation of the partner but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment; and

Determinations and authorizations of payments under this section shall be made in the manner specified in subsection (e).

Unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise, a partner of the partnership who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court, after giving any notice the court considers necessary may order indemnification if it determines:

That the partner is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (b), in which case the court shall also order the partnership to pay the partner's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification; or

The partner is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all of the relevant circumstances, whether or not he is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (b).

A partnership may not indemnify a partner under subsection (a) unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the partner is permissible in the circumstances because he has met the standard of conduct set forth in subsection (a).

The determination shall be made:

By the general partners by majority vote of a quorum consisting of partners not at the time parties to the proceeding;

If a quorum cannot be obtained under subdivision (e)(2)(A), by majority vote of a committee duly designated by the general partners (in which designation partners who are parties may participate), consisting solely of two (2) or more partners not at the time parties to the proceeding;

By independent special legal counsel:

Selected by the general partners or its committee in the manner prescribed in subdivision (e)(2)(A) or (e)(2)(B); or

If a quorum of the partners cannot be obtained under subdivision (e)(2)(A) and a committee cannot be designated under subdivision (e)(2)(B), selected by majority vote of the general partners (in which selection partners who are parties may participate); or

By the limited partners, but those who are at the time parties to the proceeding may not vote on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made by those entitled under subdivision (e)(2)(C) to select counsel.

Unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise:

A limited partner of the partnership who is not a general partner is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (b), and is entitled to apply for a court-ordered indemnification under subsection (d), in each case to the same extent as a general partner;

The partnership may indemnify and advance expenses under this part to an officer, employee or agent of the partnership who is not a partner to the same extent as to a partner; and

A partnership may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee or agent who is not a partner to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its partnership agreement, general or specific action of its partners or contract.

A partnership may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a partner, officer, employee or agent of the partnership, or who, while a partner, officer, employee or agent of the partnership, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a partner, officer, trustee, employee or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against the liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a partner, officer, employee or agent, whether or not the partnership would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under this section.

The indemnification and advancement of expenses granted pursuant to, or provided by, this section shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which a partner, officer, employee or agent seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled, whether contained in this section, the partnership agreement, action of partners or an agreement providing for such indemnification; provided, however, that no indemnification may be made to or on behalf of any person if a judgment or other final adjudication adverse to the person establishes his liability:

For any breach of the duty of loyalty to the partnership or its partners;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or

For any distribution made in violation of the partnership agreement or any section of this chapter.

This part does not limit a partnership's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a partner, officer, employee or agent in connection with his appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 61-2-101 — 61-2-130 (Acts 1919, ch. 120, §§ 1-26, 28-31; Code 1932, §§ 7883-7912; Shan. Supp. §§ 3141a1-3141a26, 3141a28-3141a31; Acts 1983, ch. 21, § 1; 1984, ch. 648, § 1; 1985, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-201—61-229), concerning Uniform Limited Partnership Act, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-301, 6-302.

Law Reviews.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399.